Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.130

Center for the improvement of student learning.

Provisions in subsections (1) through (5) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these specific purposes.

(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction shall establish the center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work in conjunction with parents, educational service districts, institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2) The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall:

(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of higher education in the state to support educational improvement initiatives in Washington schools and districts;

(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status; research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students learn the essential academic learning requirements;

(c) Periodically review the efficacy of programs and practices designed to meet the needs of students who are not meeting academic standards as defined in RCW 28A.165.015, starting with the best practices and strategies included on the state menus developed under RCW 28A.165.035, as repealed by chapter 111, Laws of 2021, and RCW 28A.655.235, and the services and activities listed in RCW 28A.165.035, as repealed by chapter 111, Laws of 2021;

(d) Develop and maintain an internet website to increase the availability of information, research, and other materials;

(e) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and school administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(f) Provide training and consultation services, including conducting regional summer institutes;

(g) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(h) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents including, but not limited to, email, phone, and postal mail;

(i) By December 1, 2026, and by December 1st annually thereafter: (i) Review the learning assistance program information submitted as required by RCW 28A.165.100; and (ii) report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a summary of the innovations made by school districts to reduce barriers to the academic achievement of students participating in the learning assistance program; and

(j) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and employ a director for the center.

(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or organizations including but not limited to: School districts; educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers; higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible, shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist educators and others in schools and districts.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for the improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the center for the improvement of student learning have been used and by whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and application of knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning and greater family and community involvement in the public education system.

[ 2021 c 111 s 9; 2016 c 72 s 804; 2009 c 578 s 6; 2008 c 165 s 1; 2006 c 116 s 2; 1999 c 388 s 401; 1996 c 273 s 5; 1993 c 336 s 501; 1986 c 180 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.510.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 116: "The legislature finds that expanding activity in educational research, educational restructuring, and educational improvement initiatives has produced and continues to produce much valuable information. The legislature finds that such information should be shared with the citizens and educational community of the state as widely as possible. The legislature further finds that students and schools benefit from increased parental, guardian, and community involvement in education and increased knowledge of and input regarding the delivery of public education. The legislature further finds that increased community involvement with, knowledge of, and input regarding the public education system is particularly needed in low-income and ethnic minority communities.

The legislature finds that the center for the improvement of student learning, created by the legislature in 1993 under the auspices of the superintendent of public instruction, has not been allocated funding since the 2001-2003 biennium, and in effect no longer exists. It is the intent of the legislature to reactivate the center for the improvement of student learning, and to create an educational ombudsman [ombuds] to increase parent, guardian, and community involvement in public education and to serve as a resource for parents and students and as an advocate for students in the public education system." [ 2006 c 116 s 1.]

Effective date—1996 c 273: See note following RCW 28A.300.290.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.

Definitions: RCW 28A.655.010.